Louisiana, session 2026, HB560.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:1052(5) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1052. Objects Objectives of the districts
The objects objectives and purposes of the hospital service districts and the
governing bodies created pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter shall be all of the
following:
* * *
(5) To cooperate with other public and private institutions, healthcare
facilities, and agencies engaged in providing hospital and other health services to
residents of the district.